Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.002

Findings—Purpose.

The legislature finds that the health and well-being of the people of this state are of paramount importance.

The legislature further finds that the conduct of members of the dental profession licensed to practice dentistry in this state plays a vital role in preserving the health and well-being of the people of the state.

The legislature further finds that requiring continuing dental education for all licensed dentists in the state is an important component of providing high quality dentistry for the people of this state.

The legislature further finds that there is no effective means of handling disciplinary proceedings against members of the dental profession licensed in this state when such proceedings are necessary for the protection of the public health.

Therefore, the legislature declares its intention to exercise the police power of the state to protect the public health, to promote the welfare of the state, and to provide a commission to act as a disciplinary and regulatory body for the members of the dental profession licensed to practice dentistry in this state.

It is the purpose of the commission established in RCW 18.32.0351 to regulate the competency and quality of professional health care providers under its jurisdiction by establishing, monitoring, and enforcing qualifications for licensure, continuing education, consistent standards of practice, continuing competency mechanisms, and discipline. Rules, policies, and procedures developed by the commission must promote the delivery of quality health care to the residents of the state.

[ 1999 c 364 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 201.]